Utah statutes.
19-6-712.   Issuance of permits -- Public comments and hearing.

(1)  In considering permit applications under this part, the executive secretary shall:

(a)  ensure the application is complete prior to acting on it;

(b) (i)  publish notice of the permit application and the opportunity for public comment in:

(A)  a newspaper of general circulation in the state; and

(B)  a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the operation for which the application is submitted is located; and

(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101;

(c)  allow the public to submit written comments to the executive secretary within 15 days after date of publication;

(d)  consider timely submitted public comments and the criteria established in this part and by rule in determining whether to grant the permit; and

(e)  send a written copy of the decision to the applicant and to persons submitting timely comments under Subsection (1)(c).

(2)  The executive secretary's decision under this section may be appealed to the board only within the 30 days after the day the decision is mailed to the applicant.

